src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VAI_CNJ_1_END
!         # ; !Medler didn't nasalize
0:h         # ; !left over morpheme chunk ... first person aan turns to aanh, pret turns to baanh

LEXICON VAI_CNJ_MODE_GET
            VAI_CNJ_PRT ;
            VAI_CNJ_ITR ; 
@D.Mode@    #  ; !cannot pick up pcp if no mode (direct route to pcp already exists)

LEXICON VAI_CNJ_PRT 
+Prt:%>b1an2   VAI_CNJ_DUB_GET ;
@R.Mode.Dub@    VAI_CNJ_DUB ;
!@D.Mode@    VAI_CNJ_DUB_GET ;
!@R.Mode@    VAI_CNJ_DUB ; !otherwise, you can end, or pick up +Dub
!unclear why commented out section here behaved differently from  VAI_CNJ_PRT_1

LEXICON VAI_CNJ_DUB_GET
@D.Mode.Dub@    VAI_CNJ_PRT_I1  ; !check for participle
@R.Mode.Dub@    VAI_CNJ_DUB ;

LEXICON VAI_CNJ_PRT_I1
0:i1    VAI_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !pret participles pluralize with iig
                            !ideally i1 in b1an2i1 would delete before dub, but morpheme boundary triggers i1->ii, which is shortened to i
!} preterite end

!{dubitative slot 
LEXICON VAI_CNJ_DUB 
+Dub:%>en2 VAI_CNJ_PCP_GET ;

!} dub end
!{participles (redundant with nominal periph slot)
LEXICON VAI_CNJ_NO_MODE_3PL_GATEWAY
0:y1        VAI_CNJ_PCP_PL ;
            VAI_CNJ_ITR ; 
@P.3Num.Pl@ VAI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B;

LEXICON VAI_CNJ_NO_MODE_3OBV_GATEWAY
0:y1        VAI_CNJ_PCP_OBV ;
        VAI_CNJ_ITR ; 
@P.3Num.Obv@ VAI_CNJ_DUB_EARLY_B;

LEXICON VAI_CNJ_PCP_GET
@R.Ccnj@@R.3Num.Pl@     VAI_CNJ_PCP_PL ;
@R.Ccnj@@R.3Num.Obv@    VAI_CNJ_PCP_OBV ;
                # ;

LEXICON VAI_CNJ_PCP_PL
+Pcp+3Pl:%>ag # ;

LEXICON VAI_CNJ_PCP_OBV
+Pcp+3Obv:%>an # ;

!} participle end
!{start iterative
LEXICON VAI_CNJ_ITR
+Itr:y1an2 # "weight: 1" ; 
!iterative end}

!} cnj end 

!#####
!{VAI Imperative suffixes 
!#####
!Insert schematic template here (also update style guide)

!just one slot under our analysis
LEXICON VAI_IMPER 
+2:c2n       # ;
+2Pl:c2g       # ;
+21Pl:c2daa      # ;
!+Imm+2:%>n       # ;
!+Imm+2Pl:g       # ;
!+Imm+21Pl:daa      # ;
+Del+2:c2kan     # ; !stem-final short vowels may lengthen before this suff
+Del+2Pl:c2keg     # ; !stem-final short vowels may lengthen before this suff
+Del+21Pl:c2kang    # ; !nothing given for VAIs in Valentine 2001. Gap filled by comparing with VTI imperatives, which are basically identical (unsurprisingly). stem-final short vowels presumably may lengthen before this suff
+Neg+2:%>ken2    # ;  !> for voicing
+Neg+2Pl:%>kegon2  # ; !> for voicing
+Neg+21Pl:siidaa  # ;
+Neg+21Pl:c1siidaa  # ; !optional c1 to take advantage of the rule cnjVoi that voices sii in exactly the places we want it to be voiced here
!<+Neg +21Pl:(c1) s i i d a a>  # ;

!} imp end
!} VAI end

!#####
!# VII Morphological sub-classes
!#####

!{ VII start
LEXICON VII_ORDERS_GET
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@       VII_INDEP_NEG ;
@D.Person@                    VII_CNJ ; 

LEXICON VII_CNJ
+Cnj:c1             VII_CNJ_NEG ;

!{ Independent order
!negation needs closer attention
LEXICON VII_INDEP_NEG
+Neg:c1%>sinoon2  VII_INDEP_OBV ; !c1 triggers s->z / n _
            VII_INDEP_OBV ;

LEXICON VII_INDEP_OBV
+%0:0       VII_INDEP_MODE ;
+%0:w5      VII_INDEP_PERIPH ;
+%0Obv:iniw   VII_INDEP_OBV_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON VII_INDEP_OBV_GATEWAY
                VII_INDEP_MODE ;
                VII_INDEP_PERIPH ;

LEXICON VII_INDEP_MODE  !these morphemes are optional, enforced by routing prior morphemes around this slot 
                        !necessary to get proper spellout of +0Pl
+Prt:%>ban2i1     VII_INDEP_PERIPH ;
+Dub:%>dig        VII_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH ;
+Prt+Dub:%>goban2i1  VII_INDEP_PERIPH ;

LEXICON VII_INDEP_PERIPH 
+%0Pl:%>an  # ; !0pl (no mode) is -wan (post v), -oon (post c), -noon (post-v, recut?)
+%0Pl:%>noon  # ; !would be nice to delete first n post-C (no, that would make needless ambiguity since phon generates oon from Cw5>an), better to prevent this allomorph entirely ... can't generate this from phonology because I don't know of n popping up elsewhere. 
        # ; 

LEXICON VII_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH 
+%0Pl:enan  # ; !0pl (no mode) is -wan (post v), -oon (post c), -noon (post-v, recut?)
        # ; 
!} independent end

!{ Conjunct order
LEXICON VII_CNJ_NEG
+Neg+%0:%>sinog   #  ; !need to disqualify sinoog  ! might be good to put morph boundary after c1 (only a couple of continuations lack it ... it is just really tricky phonology)
+Neg:%>sinoo      VII_CNJ_NUM_GATEWAY ; 
                VII_CNJ_NUM_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON VII_CNJ_NUM_GATEWAY
        VII_CNJ_SG ;
        VII_CNJ_OBV ;

LEXICON VII_CNJ_SG
+%0:%>g       VII_CNJ_PRT ;
0+%0:w4g       VII_CNJ_DUB_PRT_DUB ;

LEXICON VII_CNJ_OBV
+%0Obv:%>nig   VII_CNJ_PRT ;
+%0Obv:%>nig   VII_CNJ_DUB_PRT_DUB ;


LEXICON VII_CNJ_PRT
+Prt:%>ban2i1    VII_CNJ_CCNJ_GET ;
+Pcp:y1         VII_CNJ_PCP_CCNJ_GET ;
                VII_CNJ_ITR_CCNJ_GET ;
                # ;


LEXICON VII_CNJ_DUB_PRT_DUB
+Dub:wen         VII_CNJ_CCNJ_GET ; !epenthetic i (c-final stems) becomes o (C_gwenh -> Cogwenh)
+Prt+Dub:obanen2 VII_CNJ_CCNJ_GET ; !epenthetic i becomes o as above,

LEXICON VII_CNJ_CCNJ_GET 
@R.Ccnj@    VII_CNJ_ITR_PCP_GATEWAY ;
            # ; 


LEXICON VII_CNJ_PCP_CCNJ_GET 
@R.Ccnj@    VII_CNJ_PCP ;

LEXICON VII_CNJ_ITR_CCNJ_GET 
@R.Ccnj@    VII_CNJ_ITR ;

LEXICON VII_CNJ_ITR_PCP_GATEWAY
            VII_CNJ_ITR ;
            VII_CNJ_PCP ; 

LEXICON VII_CNJ_ITR
+Itr:%>n2    # ; !it isn't really clear from Valentine 2001 which forms can be iteratives. only forms with no mode are listed in the grammar, but it could be possible that mode is allowed.

LEXICON VII_CNJ_PCP
+%0+Pl:%>an    # ; 
!} conjunct end

!} VII end

!#####
!{Transitive Verb Morphological sub-classes
!#####

!Original plan was to have transitives go through the same point
!as they were united in requiring prefixes in the independent order
!turns out that isn't true ...
!so this is obsolete
!as with VAI's much of this will probably be transferred to VERBS
!LEXICON TRANS_INDEP 
!+VTA+Indep:0        VTA_INDEP_THEME_GET ;
!+VTI+Indep:0        VTI_INDEP ;!name needs to be followed by morpheme slot


!#####
!#VTA Inflection 
!#####
!{ VTA

!#####
!#VTA Independent order Inflection 
!#####
!{ VTA indep
!Valentine (2001):274
!Insert schematic template here (also update style guide)


!prefix theme   negation    number  mode    periph
!                           inan    number  mode    periph

!see gt-norm-yamls/OJI_VTA_YAML_NOTES.txt for some discussion

!while theme signs are overwhelmingly object agreement,
!the local person theme signs are quite fused with number, subject ... and even negation
!which makes it so subject features are fairly unavoidable early on
!strangely, while the choice of theme sign in conjunction with the prefix tells you a huge amount
!about the subject and object, there is no dedicated location for subject features
!they are sprinkled around the verb and get their interpretation from the theme sign ultimately
!so treating the theme sign like it has subject features actually makes things really complicated,
!because you might have to be checking whether this was subject number or object number, even though they are the same morph
!   probably not true, what's wrong with +3Sub ... +3Pl?
!but you do need to introduce features that you wouldn't normally have to ...
!-> ultimately just wrote out tags identifying themes, left to abstraction module to unpack (DAB 5/1/2017)
!inan subjects are disambiguated from 3 subjects after the theme sign
!so if you are adding inan subject at the theme sign, you need to introduce a feature

!#####
!#Theme sign slot
!#####

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_GET 
@R.Person@@D.Theme.Inv@      VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIR ;
@R.Person@                   VTA_INDEP_THEME_INV ;
@R.Person.2@                 VTA_INDEP_THEME_SECOND_PERSON ;
!style on new line for substantively different entries of sublexicon


LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_INV
+ThmInv:%>igo  VTA_INDEP_THEME_INVERSE_SET ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIR
+ThmDir:aa   VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_GATEWAY ; !gateway usage unformalized now

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_INVERSE_SET 
@P.Theme.Inv@   VTA_INDEP_THEME_INVERSE_NEG ;
!new flag diacritic

!##Second persons
!{ local preds
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_SECOND_PERSON 
+Thm1:i2          VTA_INDEP_2V1_NEG ; !first person object (2v1)
+Thm1Pl2:%>igoo        VTA_INDEP_1PLV2_NEG ; !first person plural subject (1pl v 2)
+Thm2:%>in        VTA_INDEP_1SGV2 ; !first person (singular by default) subject (1 v 2 inversion)
+Thm2+Neg:isinoon  VTA_INDEP_1SGV2 ;!negated first person (singular by default) subject (1pl v 2 inversion)
!new tags

!####
!{negation through number 
!####
!{2 v 1 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_2V1_NEG 
+Neg:sii    VTA_INDEP_2V1_GATEWAY ;
            VTA_INDEP_2V1_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_2V1_GATEWAY 
+1Pl:min2 VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_PLURAL_PREMODE ;
+2Pl:mw   VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_PLURAL_PREMODE ;
            VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_SINGULAR_PREMODE ;
!} 2v1 end

!{1Pl v 2 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_1PLV2_NEG
+Neg:sii    VTA_INDEP_1PLV2_GATEWAY ;
            VTA_INDEP_1PLV2_GATEWAY ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_1PLV2_GATEWAY 
+2Pl:mw   VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_PLURAL_PREMODE ;
            VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_SINGULAR_PREMODE ;
!} 1pl v 2 end

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_1SGV2 
+2Pl:inimw   VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_PLURAL_PREMODE ;
            VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_SINGULAR_PREMODE ;

!####
!{mode and such 
!####

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_PLURAL_PREMODE 
0:aa    VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_MODE ;
# ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_SINGULAR_PREMODE 
0:naa    VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_MODE ;
# ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_LOCAL_MODE 
+Prt:ban2 # ;
+Dub:dig # ;
!} mode end
!} local v local (after theme) end
!} local v local end

!#####
!#Negation Slot
!#####

!{ negation
!direct negation {
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_GATEWAY !gateway usage unformalized now
!probably best to have a coherent mapping between graphviz branches, states, labels and lexc :)
!currently using quasi_semantic naming principles

+Neg:siwaa VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_PLURAL_NEGATION_GET ; 
+Neg:sii    VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_NEGATION_IFULL_SII_GET ; !direct theme sign w/1st pl usually negates with siwaa, but sii if mode appears
!+Neg:sii VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_NEGATION_1_PL_MODE ; !direct theme sign has special negative for first person plural forms but only if there is no mode marking -> sii if mode marked
+Neg:sii   VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_SINGULAR_NEGATION_GET ;
           VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_NEGATION_IFULL_SII_GET 
@D.Person.3@ VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_NEGATION_IFULL_MODE ;

!{Direct plural negation 

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_PLURAL_NEGATION_GET
@D.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_NEGATION_IFULL_NO_MODE  ;  !siwaa bans 1Pl+mode, sii is exceptionally used DAB 04/2017
                                                 !note also: spring 2k16 visualization recognized 21, 1pl as distinct
                                                 !here they are emergent, and rather than R.1, R.2, we have D.3
@R.Person.2@    VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_ILESS ;
@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_3 ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_NEGATION_IFULL_MODE
+1Pl:minaa     VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ; 

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_NEGATION_IFULL_NO_MODE
+1Pl:naan2y1   VTA_INDEP_IFULL_PERIPH_GET ; 

!} direct pl negation end

!{Direct singular negation 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_DIRECT_SINGULAR_NEGATION_GET
@D.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_ILESS_GATEWAY ; !deviating from graphviz slightly (21, 1pl collapsed, D instead of R)
@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_3_GATEWAY ;
!tempting to send to VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_3, but we are out of phase
!there is a waa-reading state, and a gateway
!move into the gateway if read nothing
!gateway is the closest analog to I-less3 NoNum3
!what style recs do we make here?

!} direct sg negation end
!} direct negation end

!{inverse negation, inverse no negation, direct no negation 
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_INVERSE_NEG 
+Neg:sii    VTA_INDEP_THEME_INVERSE_NEG_SET ; !convention for what to name setters after?
               VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_THEME_INVERSE_NEG_SET
@P.Negation.1@  VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET ;

!} direct no neg, inverse end
!} negation end

!######
!#Number Slot
!#####
